en: Vegetables terrines, Vegetable mousses
fr: Terrines de légumes, Mousses de légumes
hr: Terine od povrća
nl: Groenteschotels

en: Terrines from Brittany
fr: Terrines bretonnes, Terrine bretonne, Terrine de Bretagne
hr: Terine iz bretanje
nl: Bretonse terrines, Bretonse vleespotten, Bretonse terrine

en: Bison terrines
fr: Terrines de bison
hr: Terine bizona
nl: Bizonvleesterrines, Bizonvleespotten

en: Blood sausage terrines
de: Blutwurst-Terrinen
fr: Terrines de boudin, terrine de boudin
hr: Terine od krvavica
nl: Bloedworstterinnes, Bloedworstterrine

en: Seafood terrine
fr: Terrine de fruits de mer

en: Seafood terrine with fish
fr: Terrine de fruits de mer avec poisson

en: Seafood terrine without fish
fr: Terrine de fruits de mer sans poisson

en: Country terrines
de: Terrinen nach Bauern Art, Terrinen nach Bauernart, Bauernterrinen, Landterrinen, Terrinen nach Art der Bauern
fi: maaseututerriinit
fr: Terrines de campagne
hr: Seoske terine
it: Terrine di campagna
nl: Landvleespotten

fr: Terrines de cerf
nl: Hertevleesterrines, Hertevleespotten

en: Pheasant terrines
fr: Terrines de faisan
hr: Terine za fazane
nl: Fazantterrines, fazantterrine, Fazantvleespotten

en: Liver terrines
fi: maksaterriinit
fr: Terrines de foie, terrine de foie
hr: Jetrene terine
it: Terrine di fegato
nl: Leverterrines, Lverterrine, Levervleespotten

en: Pork terrines
bg: Свински терин
fr: Terrines de porc

en: Rabbit terrines
bg: Заешки терин
fi: kaniterriinit
fr: Terrines de lapin
hr: Terine od kunića
it: Terrine di coniglio
nl: Konijnterrines, Konijnterrine, Konijnevleespotten

en: Chicken terrines
fr: Terrines de poulet
hr: Pileće terine
nl: Kipterrines, Kipterrine, Kippevleespotten

fr: Terrines de Saint-Jacques, Terrines de St-Jacques
nl: St. Jacobsschelpterrines, St. Jacobsschelpterrine

en: Boar terrines
fi: villisikaterriinit
fr: Terrines de sanglier
hr: Terine od vepra
it: Terrine di cinghiale
nl: Everzwijnterrines, Everzwijnterrine, Everzwijnvleespotten

en: Poultry terrines
de: Geflügelterrinen
fi: siipikarjaterriinit
fr: Terrines de volailles
hr: Terine za perad
nl: Gevogelte terrines, Gevogelte terrine, Gevogelte vleespotten

en: Duck terrines
de: Ententerrinen, Entensuppen
fi: ankkaterriinit
fr: Terrines de canard
hr: Pačje terine
it: Terrine d'anatra
nl: Eendterrines, Eendterrine, Eendevleespotten

fr: Terrines de canard aux morilles
de: Ententerrine mit Morcheln
es: Terrina de pato con morillas
it: Terrina di anatra con funghi morchella
nl: Eendterrine met morieljes

en: Dietary supplements, food supplements
af: Diëet aanvulling
ar: مكمل غذائي
bs: Prehrambeni suplement
ca: Suplements dietètics
cs: Doplněk stravy
da: Kosttilskud
de: Nahrungsergänzungsmittel
el: Συμπλήρωμα διατροφής
eo: Dieta suplementoj
es: Suplementos dietéticos, Complementos alimenticios
eu: Elikadura-osagarri
fa: مکمل‌های غذایی طبیعی
fi: Ravintolisät, Lisäravintoaine
fr: Compléments alimentaires, complément alimentaire
gl: Suplemento dietético
he: תוספי תזונה
hi: खाद्य पूरक
hr: dodaci prehrani, zdravlje dodaci prehrani
hu: Táplálék-kiegészítők
id: Suplemen makanan
it: Supplementi dietetici, integratore alimentare
ja: サプリメント
jv: Suplemen panganan
kk: Биологиялық белсенді қоспалар, Bïologïyalıq belsendi qospalar, بىيولوگىييالىق بەلسەندى قوسپالار
ko: 식이 보충제
lt: Maisto papildas, Maisto papildai
lv: Uztura bagātinātāji
mk: Додаток во исхраната
ms: Penokok pemakanan
nb: Kosttilskudd
nl: Voedingssupplementen
nn: Kosttilskot
pl: Suplementy diety
pt: Suplemento alimentar
ro: Suplimente pentru dietă, Supliment alimentar
ru: Биологически активные добавки, БАД
sh: Dijetetski suplement
sl: Prehransko dopolnilo
sr: Дијететски суплемент, Dijetetski suplementi
sv: Kosttillskott
ta: உணவுக் குறைநிரப்பி
th: อาหารเสริม
tr: Gıda takviyesi
uk: Біологічно активні добавки
vi: Chế phẩm bổ sung
zh: 膳食补充剂